Nevada, session 83, SB500.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The total public support for school districts,
charter schools and university schools for profoundly gifted pupils
for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 is an estimated average of $13,889 per
pupil.
2. As used in this section, “total public support” includes all
money appropriated directly for the support of the public schools in
this State, including, without limitation, the statewide base per pupil
funding amount, adjusted base per pupil funding, additional
weighted funding and all money appropriated for a specific program
or purpose in support of the public schools, and all other money
projected to be received for the support of the public schools from
taxes, fees and other revenues authorized by state law, excluding
any money provided by the Federal Government directly to a public
school or school district or otherwise provided on a one-time basis
in response to an emergency.
Sec. 2. 1. The total public support for school districts,
charter schools and university schools for profoundly gifted pupils
for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 is an estimated average of $13,963 per
pupil.
2. As used in this section, “total public support” includes all
money appropriated directly for the support of the public schools in
this State, including, without limitation, the statewide base per pupil
funding amount, adjusted base per pupil funding, additional
weighted funding and all money appropriated for a specific program
or purpose in support of the public schools, and all other money
projected to be received for the support of the public schools from
taxes, fees and other revenues authorized by state law, excluding
any money provided by the Federal Government directly to a public
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
school or school district or otherwise provided on a one-time basis
in response to an emergency.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan Account in the
State Education Fund the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ........................ $1,396,505,764
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ........................ $1,376,804,316
2. The Legislature declares that the money appropriated by this
section is sufficient, when combined with other money reasonably
available for this purpose, to fund the operation of the public
schools in this State for kindergarten through grade 12 for the next
ensuing biennium for the population reasonably estimated for that
biennium.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the money
appropriated by subsection 1 must be:
(a) Expended in accordance with the allotment, transfer, work
program and budget provisions of NRS 353.150 to 353.246,
inclusive; and
(b) Work-programmed for the 2 separate fiscal years of the
2025-2027 biennium, as required by NRS 353.215.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, transfers to
and from allotments must be allowed and made in accordance with
NRS 353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, after separate consideration of
the merits of each request. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection 4 of NRS 353.220, the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee is not required for any request for the revision of a work
program for such money.
5. The money appropriated by subsection 1 is available for
both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and may be
transferred from one fiscal year to the other with recommendation
and approval of the Governor without approval of the Interim
Finance Committee.
Sec. 4. 1. Expenditure from or transfer to the Pupil-Centered
Funding Plan Account in the State Education Fund of
$4,359,915,395 from money in the State Education Fund that was
not appropriated from the State General Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
2. Expenditure from or transfer to the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan Account in the State Education Fund of $4,416,907,000 from
money in the State Education Fund that was not appropriated from
the State General Fund is hereby authorized during Fiscal Year
2026-2027.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
3. The money authorized to be expended or transferred by
subsections 1 and 2 must be expended or transferred in accordance
with the allotment, transfer, work program and budget provisions of
NRS 353.150 to 353.246, inclusive. Transfers to and from
allotments must be allowed and made in accordance with NRS
353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, after separate consideration of the
merits of each request.
Sec. 5. 1. For each respective school district, the Department
of Education shall transfer from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan
Account in the State Education Fund the following sums for food
services and transportation for pupils and any other similar service
for Fiscal Year 2025-2026:
Food Services Transportation
Carson City $334,457 $2,868,747
Churchill $0 $1,665,797
Clark $0 $135,130,854
Douglas $0 $3,977,265
Elko $350,372 $5,601,775
Esmeralda $49,284 $328,550
Eureka $399,223 $434,259
Humboldt $4,765 $2,016,344
Lander $15,558 $400,471
Lincoln $66,961 $635,350
Lyon $0 $5,367,830
Mineral $200,104 $388,223
Nye $0 $4,888,451
Pershing $26,439 $918,038
Storey $23,002 $547,375
Washoe $0 $25,630,842
White Pine $29,539 $1,312,803
2. For each respective school district, charter school and
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, the Department of
Education shall transfer from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan
Account in the State Education Fund the following sums which may
be used for local funding for pupils with disabilities for Fiscal Year
2025-2026:
Carson City $6,741,119
Churchill $2,215,685
Clark $453,025,801
Douglas $5,428,400
Elko $6,815,778
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Esmeralda $44,620
Eureka $200,000
Humboldt $3,147,883
Lander $828,068
Lincoln $0
Lyon $11,959,030
Mineral $110,574
Nye $12,987,281
Pershing $0
Storey $55,048
Washoe $70,479,875
White Pine $1,129,956
Charter Schools, combined $24,608,056
University Schools, combined $52,268
3. The statewide base per pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 is $9,416 per pupil.
4. For each respective school district, the adjusted base per
pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 is:
Carson City $10,119
Churchill $10,766
Clark $9,501
Douglas $10,622
Elko $11,658
Esmeralda $31,441
Eureka $35,764
Humboldt $11,596
Lander $14,100
Lincoln $17,166
Lyon $11,491
Mineral $16,481
Nye $11,424
Pershing $15,293
Storey $24,307
Washoe $9,708
White Pine $15,055
5. For each charter school or university school for profoundly
gifted pupils, the statewide base per pupil funding amount for each
pupil enrolled full-time in a program of distance education provided
by such a school in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 is $9,416. For each
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
which provides in-person instruction in each of the respective
counties, the adjusted base per pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2025-2026, before application of the appropriate attendance area
adjustment and cost adjustment factor, is $9,416.
6. The Department of Education shall determine the final
adjusted base per pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year 2025-2026
for a charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
by applying the appropriate attendance area adjustment and cost
adjustment factor for the location of the charter school or university
school within a county to the amount established by subsection 5 for
the county in which the charter school or university school is
located.
7. The additional weighted funding for each pupil estimated to
be enrolled in a public school in each respective category for Fiscal
Year 2025-2026, expressed as a multiplier to the statewide base per
pupil funding amount, is:
For English learners 0.45
For at-risk pupils 0.35
For gifted and talented pupils 0.12
8. For each respective school district, charter school and
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, the Department of
Education shall transfer from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan
Account in the State Education Fund the following sums for
additional weighted funding at the levels established by subsection 7
for Fiscal Year 2025-2026:
English At-Risk Gifted and
Learners Pupils Talented
Pupils
Carson City $3,305,034 $728,331 $322,029
Churchill $483,044 $286,718 $0
Clark $164,522,907 $137,341,591 $6,142,279
Douglas $682,193 $474,569 $133,331
Elko $2,834,703 $1,489,619 $42,937
Esmeralda $17,401 $8,386 $0
Eureka $10,213 $1,198 $0
Humboldt $834,733 $349,335 $0
Lander $165,252 $260,354 $0
Lincoln $33,898 $135,120 $0
Lyon $2,271,151 $1,281,996 $67,795
Mineral $144,066 $141,712 $0
Nye $1,597,433 $893,112 $0
Pershing $122,880 $92,278 $0
Storey $13,777 $13,777 $0
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
English At-Risk Gifted and
Learners Pupils Talented
Pupils
Washoe $28,541,936 $14,504,015 $1,462,125
White Pine $63,558 $395,474 $0
Charter Schools,
combined $27,050,440 $6,614,302 $1,684,719
University Schools,
combined $0 $0 $0
9. Pursuant to the expression of legislative intent in subsection
3 of NRS 387.121, the Esmeralda, Eureka and Storey County school
districts may each reapportion money received pursuant to
subsections 4 and 8 in a manner similar to the apportionment of
such money in the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2020, to ensure
that each pupil in the district receives a reasonably equal educational
opportunity.
Sec. 6. 1. For each respective school district, the Department
of Education shall transfer from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan
Account in the State Education Fund the following sums for food
services and transportation for pupils and any other similar service
for Fiscal Year 2026-2027:
Food Services Transportation
Carson City $334,457 $2,868,747
Churchill $0 $1,665,797
Clark $0 $135,130,854
Douglas $0 $3,977,265
Elko $350,372 $5,601,775
Esmeralda $49,284 $328,550
Eureka $399,223 $434,259
Humboldt $4,765 $2,016,344
Lander $15,558 $400,471
Lincoln $66,961 $635,350
Lyon $0 $5,367,830
Mineral $200,104 $388,223
Nye $0 $4,888,451
Pershing $26,439 $918,038
Storey $23,002 $547,375
Washoe $0 $25,630,842
White Pine $29,539 $1,312,803
2. For each respective school district, charter school and
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, the Department of
Education shall transfer from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Account in the State Education Fund the following sums which may
be used for local funding for pupils with disabilities for Fiscal Year
2026-2027:
Carson City $6,741,119
Churchill $2,215,685
Clark $453,025,801
Douglas $5,428,400
Elko $6,815,778
Esmeralda $44,620
Eureka $200,000
Humboldt $3,147,883
Lander $828,068
Lincoln $0
Lyon $11,959,030
Mineral $110,574
Nye $12,987,281
Pershing $0
Storey $55,048
Washoe $70,479,875
White Pine $1,129,956
Charter Schools, combined $24,608,056
University Schools, combined $52,268
3. The statewide base per pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year
2026-2027 is $9,486 per pupil.
4. For each respective school district, the adjusted base per
pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 is:
Carson City $10,195
Churchill $10,846
Clark $9,572
Douglas $10,701
Elko $11,745
Esmeralda $31,442
Eureka $35,765
Humboldt $11,682
Lander $14,205
Lincoln $17,294
Lyon $11,577
Mineral $16,604
Nye $11,509
Pershing $15,407
Storey $24,308
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Washoe $9,781
White Pine $15,167
5. For each charter school or university school for profoundly
gifted pupils, the statewide base per pupil funding amount for each
pupil enrolled full-time in a program of distance education provided
by such a school in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 is $9,486. For each
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
which provides in-person instruction in each of the respective
counties, the adjusted base per pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year
2026-2027, before application of the appropriate attendance area
adjustment and cost adjustment factor, is $9,486.
6. The Department of Education shall determine the final
adjusted base per pupil funding amount for Fiscal Year 2026-2027
for a charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
by applying the appropriate attendance area adjustment and cost
adjustment factor for the location of the charter school or university
school within a county to the amount established by subsection 5 for
the county in which the charter school or university school is
located.
7. The additional weighted funding for each pupil estimated to
be enrolled in a public school in each respective category for Fiscal
Year 2026-2027, expressed as a multiplier to the statewide base per
pupil funding amount, is:
For English learners 0.45
For at-risk pupils 0.35
For gifted and talented pupils 0.12
8. For each respective school district, charter school and
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, the Department of
Education shall transfer from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan
Account in the State Education Fund the following projected sums
for additional weighted funding at the levels established by
subsection 7 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027, subject to adjustment based
on updated weighted pupil counts with approval of the Interim
Finance Committee:
English At-Risk Gifted and
Learners Pupils Talented
Pupils
Carson City $3,329,674 $733,762 $324,429
Churchill $486,645 $288,856 $0
Clark $165,749,485 $138,365,522 $6,188,072
Douglas $687,279 $478,107 $134,325
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
English At-Risk Gifted and
Learners Pupils Talented
Pupils
Elko $2,855,836 $1,500,725 $43,257
Esmeralda $17,401 $8,386 $0
Eureka $10,213 $1,198 $0
Humboldt $840,956 $351,940 $0
Lander $166,484 $262,295 $0
Lincoln $34,150 $136,128 $0
Lyon $2,288,084 $1,291,553 $68,301
Mineral $145,140 $142,768 $0
Nye $1,609,342 $899,771 $0
Pershing $123,795 $92,966 $0
Storey $13,777 $13,777 $0
Washoe $28,754,726 $14,612,148 $1,473,026
White Pine $64,033 $398,423 $0
Charter Schools,
combined $27,252,109 $6,663,618 $1,697,280
University Schools,
combined $0 $0 $0
9. Pursuant to the expression of legislative intent in subsection
3 of NRS 387.121, the Esmeralda, Eureka and Storey County school
districts may each reapportion money received pursuant to
subsections 4 and 8 in a manner similar to the apportionment of
such money in the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2020, to ensure
that each pupil in the district receives a reasonably equal educational
opportunity.
Sec. 7. The measure to be used for the purposes of
determining whether a pupil is an “at-risk pupil” pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 387.1211 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 is the
Graduation Related Analytic Data (GRAD) score within the Infinite
Campus System used by the Department of Education. If the State
Board of Education adopts a regulation prescribing a different
measure:
1. Such a regulation may not become effective before Fiscal
Year 2026-2027; and
2. If the regulation would result in an increase in the number of
pupils receiving additional weighted funding as at-risk pupils:
(a) The Department of Education shall identify adjustments in
the proportion of money transferred by subsection 8 of section 6 of
this act to each respective school district, charter school and
university school for profoundly gifted pupils which are necessary
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
to reflect updated weighted pupil counts and, with approval of the
Interim Finance Committee, adjust such transfers accordingly; and
(b) The multiplier for at-risk pupils identified in subsection 7 of
section 6 of this act must be reduced proportionally to ensure that no
additional money beyond the total amount of money transferred by
subsection 8 of section 6 of this act in each fiscal year is necessary
to fund such additional weighted funding.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Account for State Special Education Services
created by NRS 388.5243 for the support of pupils with disabilities
the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ........................... $257,566,256
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ........................... $262,431,514
2. Expenditure of $2,000,000 in both Fiscal Year 2025-2026
and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 from money in the Account for State
Special Education Services created by NRS 388.5243 that was not
appropriated from the State General Fund is hereby authorized for
expenditure for the support of pupils with disabilities.
3. The Department of Education shall transfer from the
Account for State Special Education Services created by NRS
388.5243 the following sums for pupils with disabilities:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ........................... $256,066,256
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ........................... $260,931,514
4. The money transferred pursuant to subsection 3 must be
used only to fund the school districts, charter schools and university
schools for profoundly gifted pupils for the enrollment of pupils
with disabilities in accordance with the statewide multiplier
calculated by the Department of Education pursuant to subsection 1
of NRS 387.122.
5. The Department of Education shall transfer from the
Account for State Special Education Services created by NRS
388.5243 the following sums for pupils with disabilities:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,500,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,500,000
6. The money transferred pursuant to subsection 5 must be
used only to fund the school districts, charter schools and university
schools for profoundly gifted pupils for the enrollment of pupils
with disabilities in accordance with the funding multiplier calculated
by the Department of Education pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 387.122.
7. The Department of Education may transfer from the
Account for State Special Education Services created by NRS
388.5243 the following sums for pupils with disabilities:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,000,000
8. Any money transferred pursuant to subsection 7 must be
used only to carry out the purposes of subsection 4 of
NRS 388.5243.
9. Any remaining balance of the sums transferred pursuant to
subsections 3 and 5 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year
2026-2027 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30 of
each fiscal year and must be reverted to the State General Fund on
or before September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, for each
fiscal year respectively.
Sec. 9. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Other State Education Programs Account in the
State General Fund the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ........................... $162,436,046
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ........................... $162,436,046
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1 must be expended
in accordance with the allotment, transfer, work program and budget
provisions of NRS 353.150 to 353.246, inclusive. Transfers to and
from allotments must be allowed and made in accordance with NRS
353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, after separate consideration of the
merits of each request.
3. The Department of Education shall transfer from the Other
State Education Programs Account the sum of $19,260,398 for
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and $19,260,398 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027
for distribution by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school
districts for the support of courses which are approved by the
Department of Education as meeting the course of study for an adult
standard high school diploma as approved by the State Board of
Education. In each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 biennium, the sum
transferred must be allocated among the various school districts in
accordance with a plan or formula developed by the Department of
Education to ensure that the money is distributed equitably and in a
manner that permits accounting for the expenditures of school
districts.
4. The Department of Education shall, not later than
November 1, 2025, and November 1, 2026, provide a written report
to the Governor, the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education
and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau that describes,
for the immediately preceding fiscal year, each expenditure made
from the amount transferred pursuant to subsection 3 or pursuant to
subsection 3 of section 8 of chapter 147, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
page 731, as applicable, and the performance results of the
participants in the Adult High School Diploma program.
5. Any remaining balance of the allocations made pursuant to
subsection 3 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 must be added to the money
received by the school districts for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and may
be expended as that money is expended. Any remaining balance of
the allocations made pursuant to subsection 3 for Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, including any such money added from the previous fiscal
year, must not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027,
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 17, 2027.
6. The money appropriated by subsection 1 to finance specific
programs as outlined in this subsection is available for both Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and may be transferred
from one fiscal year to the other with the approval of the Interim
Finance Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor as
follows:
(a) A total of $3,927,708 in both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the Jobs for Nevada’s Graduates
Program. Of the total transferred in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027 pursuant to this paragraph, an amount up to
$314,293 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and $314,293 in Fiscal Year
2026-2027 may only be allocated by the Department of Education to
the Jobs for Nevada’s Graduates Program for expenditure upon
determination that federal or local revenues are not received as
budgeted for the Jobs for Nevada’s Graduates Program that would
lead to program reductions.
(b) A total of $300,000 in both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for transfer
to the Leadership Institute of Nevada for the implementation and
operation of educational leadership training programs. Expenditure
of this money is contingent upon matching money being provided
from sources other than the appropriation made by subsection 1. The
Department of Education shall not distribute any money for the
implementation and operation of educational leadership training
programs until an equivalent amount of matching money has been
committed.
7. Upon acceptance of the money transferred pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 6, the Leadership Institute of Nevada
agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money transferred pursuant to paragraph
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(b) of subsection 6 from the date on which the money was received
by the Leadership Institute of Nevada through June 30, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money transferred pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 6 from the date on which the money was received
by the Leadership Institute of Nevada through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the Leadership Institute of Nevada, regardless of their
form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to
conduct an audit of the use of the money transferred pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 6.
8. Any remaining balance of the sums transferred pursuant to
subsection 6 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the money is transferred or any entity to
which such money is granted or otherwise transferred in any
manner, and any portion of the transferred money remaining must
not be spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
9. The Department of Education shall transfer from the Other
State Education Programs Account the sum of $13,543,822 in Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 and $13,543,822 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the
award of grants for programs of career and technical education
pursuant to NRS 388.393.
10. Any remaining balance of the sums transferred pursuant to
subsection 9 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30 of
each fiscal year and must be reverted to the State General Fund on
or before September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, for each
fiscal year respectively.
11. The Department of Education shall transfer from the Other
State Education Programs Account the sum of $462,725 for Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 and $462,725 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the
award of grants to support public broadcasting in this State.
12. Any remaining balance of the sums transferred pursuant to
subsection 11 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30
of each fiscal year by the entity to which the money is transferred or
any entity to which such money is granted or otherwise transferred
in any manner, and any portion of the transferred money remaining
must not be spent for any purpose after September 18, 2026, and
September 17, 2027, for each fiscal year respectively and must be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 18, 2026,
and September 17, 2027, for each fiscal year respectively.
13. The Department of Education shall transfer from the Other
State Education Programs Account the sum of $124,941,393 for
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and $124,941,393 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027
for distribution by the Department of Education to school districts to
maintain salary increases for teachers and education support
professionals approved by the Interim Finance Committee in
accordance with chapter 530, Statutes of Nevada 2023, page 3535,
disbursed monthly in amounts approximating one-twelfth of their
respective yearly apportionments.
14. Of the sums transferred by subsection 13, the Department
of Education shall distribute to the school districts specified in this
subsection up to the following sums for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027:
School District 2025-2026 2026-2027
Carson City School
District $2,644,995 $2,644,995
Churchill County
School District $1,137,980 $1,137,980
Clark County School
District $86,902,945 $86,902,945
Douglas County School
District $2,265,571 $2,265,571
Elko County School
District $3,694,245 $3,694,245
Esmeralda County
School District $77,787 $77,787
Eureka County School
District $169,122 $169,122
Humboldt County
School District $1,346,510 $1,346,510
Lander County School
District $414,364 $414,364
Lincoln County School
District $436,139 $436,139
Lyon County School
District $3,114,106 $3,114,106
Mineral County School
District $275,801 $275,801
Nye County School
District $2,083,531 $2,083,531
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
School District 2025-2026 2026-2027
Pershing County School
District $380,939 $380,939
Storey County School
District $168,882 $168,882
Washoe County School
District $19,332,519 $19,332,519
White Pine County
School District $495,957 $495,957
TOTAL: $124,941,393 $124,941,393
15. Any remaining balance of the sums transferred pursuant to
subsection 13 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027
must not be committed for expenditure after June 30 of each fiscal
year and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, for each fiscal year
respectively.
Sec. 10. 1. Expenditure of $2,436,623 in both Fiscal Year
2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 from money in the Other
State Education Programs Account that was not appropriated from
the State General Fund is hereby authorized to provide stipends
pursuant to the Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program
created by NRS 391A.705 in accordance with subsection 2. Upon
request from the Department of Education, the Department of
Employment, Training and Rehabilitation shall provide, from the
Workforce Development budget account, reimbursement for the
cost of providing stipends pursuant to the Program in accordance
with subsection 2 up to $2,436,623 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$2,436,623 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
2. The money authorized by subsection 1 and any other money
appropriated or made available for this purpose to the Other State
Education Programs Account for the Incentivizing Pathways to
Teaching Grant Program must be used to provide stipends at a rate
of up to $800 per week for up to 12 weeks.
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Professional Development Programs Account
the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $7,667,393
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $7,667,393
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1 must be expended
in accordance with the allotment, transfer, work program and budget
provisions of NRS 353.150 to 353.246, inclusive. Transfers to and
from allotments must be allowed and made in accordance with
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
NRS 353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, after separate consideration of
the merits of each request.
Sec. 12. 1. Of the sums appropriated by subsection 1 of
section 11 of this act, the Department of Education shall transfer to
the school districts specified in this subsection the following sums
for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027:
School District 2025-2026 2026-2027
Clark County School
District $4,030,407 $4,030,407
Elko County School
District $1,265,644 $1,265,644
Washoe County School
District $2,271,342 $2,271,342
TOTAL: $7,567,393 $7,567,393
2. A school district that receives a transfer of money pursuant
to subsection 1 shall serve as fiscal agent for the respective regional
training program for the professional development of teachers and
administrators. As fiscal agent, each school district is responsible for
the payment, collection and holding of all money received from this
State for the maintenance and support of the regional training
program for the professional development of teachers and
administrators and the Nevada Early Literacy Intervention Program
established and operated by the applicable governing body.
3. Any remaining balance of the transfers made pursuant to
subsection 1 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 must be added to the money
received by the school districts for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and may
be expended as that money is expended. Any remaining balance of
the transfers made pursuant to subsection 1 for Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, including any money added from the transfer for the previous
fiscal year, must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 17, 2027.
Sec. 13. 1. Of the sums appropriated by subsection 1 of
section 11 of this act, the Department of Education shall transfer to
the Statewide Council for the Coordination of the Regional Training
Programs created by NRS 391A.130 the sum of $100,000 in Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 and $100,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for
additional training opportunities for educational administrators in
Nevada.
2. The Statewide Council shall use the money transferred
pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) To disseminate research-based knowledge related to
effective educational leadership behaviors and skills.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(b) To develop, support and maintain ongoing activities,
programs, training and networking opportunities.
(c) For the purpose of providing additional training for
educational administrators, including, without limitation, to pay:
(1) Travel expenses of administrators who attend the training
program;
(2) Travel and per diem expenses for any consultants
contracted to provide additional training; and
(3) Any charges to obtain a conference room for the
provision of the additional training.
(d) To supplement and not replace the money that the school
district or the regional training program would otherwise expend for
the training of educational administrators as described in this
subsection.
3. Any remaining balance of the transfer made pursuant to
subsection 1 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 must be added to the money
received by the Statewide Council for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and
may be expended as that money is expended. Any remaining
balance of the transfer made pursuant to subsection 1 for Fiscal Year
2026-2027, including any money added from the transfer for the
previous fiscal year, must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30, 2027, and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or
before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 14. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Department of Education for the Professional Development
Programs Account the sum of $882,946 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
2. Money appropriated to the Interim Finance Committee by
subsection 1 may be allocated to the Department of Education upon
the determination of the Interim Finance Committee that sufficient
supporting documentation has been submitted detailing the amount
for collectively bargained salary and benefits increases for the fiscal
year for which the allocation is being requested.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
4. Any remaining balance of the sums allocated to the
Department of Education pursuant to subsection 2 for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30 of each fiscal year and must be reverted to
the State General Fund on or before September 18, 2026, and
September 17, 2027, for each fiscal year respectively.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Sec. 15. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the 1/5 Retirement Credit Purchase Program
Account in the State General Fund to purchase one-fifth of a year of
retirement service credit pursuant to section 5 of chapter 8, Statutes
of Nevada 2007, 23rd Special Session, at page 18, the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $560,886
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $560,886
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1 is available for
either fiscal year with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor. Any
remaining balance of those sums must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, and must be reverted to the State
General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 16. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Teach Nevada Scholarship Program Account
created by NRS 391A.575 to award grants to universities, colleges
and other providers of an alternative licensure program that are
approved to award Teach Nevada Scholarships pursuant to NRS
391A.585 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,407,861
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,407,861
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1 must be expended
in accordance with the allotment, transfer, work program and budget
provisions of NRS 353.150 to 353.246, inclusive. Transfers to and
from allotments must be allowed and made in accordance with NRS
353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, after separate consideration of the
merits of each request.
3. Expenditure of $4,503,179 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$4,450,005 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 from money in the Teach
Nevada Scholarship Program Account that was not appropriated
from the State General Fund is hereby authorized to award grants to
universities, colleges and other providers of an alternative licensure
program that are approved to award Teach Nevada Scholarships
pursuant to NRS 391A.585.
4. For the purposes of accounting and reporting, the sums
authorized for expenditure by subsection 3 are considered to be
expended before any appropriation made to the Teach Nevada
Scholarship Program Account from the State General Fund.
Sec. 17. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada Teacher Advancement Scholarship Program
Account created by NRS 391A.675 the sum of $323,628 for Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 for the 25-percent disbursement to scholarship
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
recipients who meet the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS
391A.685 and for payments to a university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program made pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 391A.690.
Sec. 18. Expenditure of $323,628 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027
from money in the Nevada Teacher Advancement Scholarship
Program Account created by NRS 391A.675 that was not
appropriated from the State General Fund is hereby authorized for
the 25-percent disbursement to scholarship recipients who meet the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.685 and for payments to
a university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program made pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 391A.690.
Sec. 19. The State Controller is hereby directed to draw his or
her warrant in the amount of $126,895,438 and transfer that sum
from the Education Stabilization Account to the Pupil-Centered
Funding Plan Account in Fiscal Year 2024-2025.
Sec. 20. The State Controller is hereby directed to draw his or
her warrant in the amount of $115,701,395 and transfer that sum
from the Education Stabilization Account in the State Education
Fund to the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan Account in Fiscal Year
2025-2026.
Sec. 21. 1. Expenditure from or transfer to the Education
Stabilization Account in the State Education Fund of $755,251,719
from money in the State Education Fund that was not appropriated
from the State General Fund is hereby authorized during Fiscal Year
2025-2026.
2. Expenditure from or transfer to the Education Stabilization
Account in the State Education Fund of $648,653,965 from money
in the State Education Fund that was not appropriated from the State
General Fund is hereby authorized during Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. The money authorized to be expended or transferred by
subsections 1 and 2 must be expended or transferred in accordance
with the allotment, transfer, work program and budget provisions of
NRS 353.150 to 353.246, inclusive. Transfers to and from
allotments must be allowed and made in accordance with NRS
353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, after separate consideration of the
merits of each request.
Sec. 22. NRS 388.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.390 If the board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school organizes a program of career
and technical education in accordance with the regulations adopted
by the State Board and the program has been approved by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, the school district or the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
charter school is entitled to share in federal and state money
available for the promotion of career and technical education in the
amount determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, in
accordance with NRS 388.390 to [388.397,] 388.396, inclusive, and
the regulations and policies of the State Board.
Sec. 23. NRS 391A.705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.705 1. There is hereby created in the Department the
Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program to award grants
to public and private universities and colleges in this State that offer
an approved traditional pathway licensure program for the provision
of [tuition assistance and] stipends to students of such programs
who meet requirements established by the State Board pursuant to
this section and NRS 391A.710.
2. A public or private university or college in this State that
offers an approved traditional pathway licensure program is eligible
to apply to the State Board for a grant to award [tuition assistance
and] stipends to students who attend the university or college to
complete such a program.
3. The State Board shall:
(a) Based on the amount of money appropriated by the
Legislature for that purpose, establish the number of awards of
[tuition assistance and] stipends that will be available pursuant to
the Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program each year
based upon the amount of money available for the Program.
(b) Review all applications submitted pursuant to subsection 2
and, to the extent that money is available within the limits of
legislative appropriations, award a grant of money in an amount
determined by the State Board to a public or private university or
college that offers an approved traditional pathway licensure
program.
4. The State Board may prioritize the award of grants to a
public or private university or college that demonstrates the
university or college, as applicable, will provide [tuition assistance
and] stipends to a greater number of students who:
(a) Are veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States or the
spouses of such veterans;
(b) Intend to teach in public schools in this State which have the
highest shortage of teachers; or
(c) Have been economically disadvantaged or belong to a racial
or ethnic minority group.
5. A student may apply for [tuition assistance and] a stipend
awarded pursuant to the Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant
Program from a public or private university or college that offers an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
approved traditional pathway licensure program that receives a grant
pursuant to the Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program
only if:
(a) The student attends or has been accepted to attend an
approved traditional pathway licensure program at the university or
college; and
(b) The student agrees to complete the requirements to obtain an
endorsement to teach English as a second language or an
endorsement to teach special education.
6. An application submitted by the student must identify the
approved traditional pathway licensure program to be completed
and the date by which the student must complete the program to
finish on schedule.
7. The State Board may adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section and NRS 391A.710.
Sec. 24. NRS 391A.710 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.710 1. Each university or college that offers an
approved traditional pathway licensure program in this State that is
awarded a grant of money pursuant to NRS 391A.705 shall use the
money to award [tuition assistance and] stipends pursuant to the
Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program to students who
will attend the university or college with the intent to complete an
approved traditional pathway licensure program. Such students may
include [:
(a) Students who are enrolled in their final three semesters of an
approved traditional pathway licensure program; and
(b) Students] students who are enrolled in their final clinical
field experience of student teaching in an approved traditional
pathway licensure program.
2. [A student who is enrolled in his or her final three semesters
of an approved traditional pathway licensure program may apply for
tuition assistance.
3.] A student who is enrolled in his or her final clinical field
experience of student teaching in an approved traditional pathway
licensure program may apply for a stipend.
[4.] 3. The student must:
(a) Agree to:
(1) Complete the approved traditional pathway licensure
program for which he or she was awarded the [tuition assistance or]
stipend; and
(2) Maintain employment as a teacher at a public school in
this State for 5 consecutive school years immediately following
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
completion of the program unless the State Board waives this
requirement for good cause shown.
(b) Meet any other requirements established by the State Board.
Sec. 25. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after May 18,
2025.
Sec. 26. NRS 388.397 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 27. 1. This section and section 19 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 18, inclusive, and 20 to 26, inclusive, of this
act become effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)